test/src/morphology/N-kipwnj9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kipõñ: # Noun (9) kipõñ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kipõñ+N+Sg+Nom: kipõñ
     kipõñ+N+Sg+Gen: kibõna
     kipõñ+N+Sg+Par: kibõnat
     kipõñ+N+Sg+Ill: kibõnahe
     kipõñ+N+Pl+Gen: kibõnidõ
     kipõñ+N+Pl+Par: kibõnit
     kipõñ+N+Pl+Ill: kibõnihe
     kipõñ+N+Pl+All: kibõnilõ
